Colorado statutes. TITLE 26 Human Services Code
ARTICLE 12
VETERANS COMMUNITY LIVING CENTERS ACT

Editor's note:

This article was numbered as article 12 of chapter 119 in C.R.S. 1963. This article was repealed and reenacted in 1973 and was subsequently repealed and reenacted in 1998, resulting in the addition, relocation, and elimination of sections as well as subject matter. For amendments to this article prior to 1998, consult the Colorado statutory research explanatory note and the table itemizing the replacement volumes and supplements to the original volume of C.R.S. 1973 beginning on page vii in the front of this volume. Former C.R.S. section numbers are shown in editor's notes following the relocated sections.

Section

PART 1 MANAGEMENT, CONTROL,
AND SUPERVISION

PART 2 SPECIFIC VETERANS COMMUNITY
LIVING CENTERS AUTHORIZED

PART 3 EVALUATION OF QUALITY OF
CARE IN STATE AND VETERANS
NURSING HOMES

PART 4 BOARD OF COMMISSIONERS OF
VETERANS COMMUNITY LIVING CENTERS